Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-2402
School board; board of educational
service unit; contract or amendment; publication; contents; contract approval;
publication.

(1)
Before the school board of any school district or the board of any educational
service unit approves a proposed contract, or any proposed amendment to an
existing contract, for future superintendent services to be rendered to such
school district by the current superintendent or future administrator services
to be rendered to such educational service unit by the current administrator,
the board shall publish a copy of such proposed contract or amendment, and
a reasonable estimate and description of all current and future costs to the
school district or educational service unit if the proposed contract or amendment
were to be approved, at least three days before the meeting of the board at
which such proposed contract or amendment will be considered. Such publication
shall also specify the date, time, and place of the public meeting at which
the proposed contract or amendment will be considered. Electronic publication
on the web site of the school district or educational service unit shall satisfy
the requirement of this subsection if such electronic publication is prominently
displayed and allows public access to the entire proposed contract or amendment.

(2) After the
school board of any school district or the board of any educational service
unit approves a contract for future superintendent services to be rendered
to such school district by a new superintendent or future administrator services
to be rendered to such educational service unit by a new administrator, the
board shall publish a copy of such contract, and a reasonable estimate and
description of all current and future costs to the school district or educational
service unit that will be incurred as a result of such contract, within two
days after the meeting of the board at which such contract was approved. Electronic
publication on the web site of the school district or educational service
unit shall satisfy the requirement of this subsection if such electronic publication
is prominently displayed and allows public access to the entire contract.

Laws 2014, LB470, § 3.
July 1, 2014